Mississippi, session 2026, SB2480.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. Upon the effective date of this act, the State Fiscal Officer shall transfer the sum of Two Hundred Sixty-five Million Dollars ($265,000,000.00) from the Capital Expense Fund (Fund No. 6499C00000) to the Capacity Project Fund (Fund No. 6619420000), created in Section 651141.2. SECTION 2.  Section 65-1-141.2, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 65-1-141.2.  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the " * * *2022 Capacity Project Fund," which shall consist of funds made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Department of Transportation, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to provide for capacity projects included in the Capacity Program of the Three-Year Plan as adopted by, amended by, or reissued by the Mississippi Transportation Commission under the authority of Section 65-1-141. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.